Utah statutes.
76-8-317.   Refusal to comply with order to evacuate or other orders issued in a local or state emergency -- Penalties.

(1)  A person may not refuse to comply with an order to evacuate issued under this chapter or refuse to comply with any other order issued by the governor in a state of an emergency under Section 63K-4-201 or by a chief executive officer in a local emergency under Section 63K-4-202, if notice of the order has been given to that person.

(2)  A person who violates this section is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.



Amended by Chapter 370, 2010 General Session

